Utah statutes.
78B-6-602.   Recommitment.

(1)  In all cases where it is claimed that a person is illegally or wrongfully restrained or deprived of his liberty, where restraint or imprisonment is for a criminal offense and there is not sufficient cause for release, even though the commitment may have been informally made or without due authority, or the process may have been executed by a person not duly authorized, the court or judge may make a new commitment, or allow the party to post bail, if the case is bailable.

(2)  All material witnesses shall be required to appear at the same time and place and not depart without leave.  All documents shall be filed in the clerk's office.

